src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON NoCGforms_plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:X3 ACCRA-I ;


! Vowel-final names where the final vowel carries
! primary or secondary stress. Monosyllables and
! Scandinavian stressed compounds in -V belong here.

!LEXICON NYSTØ-ani !Not in use
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

!LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
+Err/Lex:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NYSTØ_MWE-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;


!LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
!+N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;

!LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN ! Vowel-final, heavy syll !Not in use
!+N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON NYSTØDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
@U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL
+Sg+Nom:             K ;
+Attr:             K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s  K ; ! Ny^stø:s
+Cmp/SgNom:           RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:a  RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:   RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
            NYOBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Nom:             K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s  K ; ! Ny^stø:s
+Cmp/SgNom:           RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:a  RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:   RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
            NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
+Sg+Nom:            K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Lex:%:s K ; ! Ny^stø:s
+Cmp/SgNom:          RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Lex:a RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Lex:  RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
+Err/Lex:   NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; ! XXX Why is regular declension Sub?

LEXICON NYOBL
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
 NYOBL-suf ;
+Err/Orth:%: NYOBL-suf ;
+Err/Orth:∑- NYOBL-suf ;
+Err/Orth:'  NYOBL-suf ;

LEXICON NYOBL-suf
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a K ; !
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:a K ; !
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K ; !
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij K ; !
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K ; !
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ajn K ; !
+Ess+Err/Orth:an K ; !
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:at K ; !
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ajd K ; !
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajd K ; !
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajde K ; !
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ajn K ; !
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ajgujn K ; !

LEXICON NYOBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
 NYOBL_PLC-ORG-suf ;
+Err/Orth:%: NYOBL_PLC-ORG-suf ;
+Err/Orth:∑- NYOBL_PLC-ORG-suf ;
+Err/Orth:'  NYOBL_PLC-ORG-suf ;

LEXICON NYOBL_PLC-ORG-suf
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Ess:n K ;
!+Pl+Nom:t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a K ; !
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:a K ; !
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K ; !
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij K ; !
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K ; !
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ajn K ; !
+Ess+Err/Orth:an K ; !
!+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:at K ; !
!+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ajd K ; !
!+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajd K ; !
!+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajde K ; !
!+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ajn K ; !
!+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ajgujn K ; !

LEXICON LONDONBERN-plc  ! Lexicon for Israel
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON LONDON-SUBSTANDARD !SUB
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:i flagK ; ! This is for "Statskog:i"
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> PLACE-DIMDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> PLACE-DIMDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIM-OBL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIM-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL
                  +Sg+Nom:   K           ;
            +Sg+Nom+PxSg1:an K           ; ! Márjjážan
               +Cmp/SgNom:   RHyph       ;
               +Cmp/SgNom:   RProp       ;
      +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph       ; !
                     +Ess:in K           ;
                  +Sg+Gen:a  K           ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:   K           ; !
               +Cmp/SgGen:a  RHyph       ; ! For dims, Gen is NOT sub
        +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:   RHyph       ;
                  +Sg+Acc:a  K           ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:   K           ; !
                  +Pl+Nom:at K           ;
                         :i  PLACE-DIM-i ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL_PLC-ORG
                   +Sg+Nom:   K                   ;
                +Cmp/SgNom:   RHyph               ;
     +Cmp/SgNom:   RProp               ;
       +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph               ; !
                      +Ess:in K                   ;
                   +Sg+Gen:a  K                   ;
  +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:   K                   ; !
                +Cmp/SgGen:a  RHyph               ; ! For dims, Gen is NOT sub
         +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:   RHyph               ;
                   +Sg+Acc:a  K                   ;
  +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:   K                   ; !
!                  +Pl+Nom:at K                   ;
                          :i  PLACE-DIM-i_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
+Cmp/PlGen:jd RHyph ;
+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
!+Cmp/PlGen:jd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON PLACE-DIMV !DIMINV for propernouns
@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMVcase ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMVcase
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:aX4 RHyph ;
+Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:aX4n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
+Ess:an K ;




! Finnish Itkonen, lexicon for Finnish nen-names
! ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur
! For Finnish surnames. Itkonen.
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc
! For Finnish names with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG ;
NENPLACELASH ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-org
! For Finnish names with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-obj
! For Finnish names with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL  ! Finnish names
:s FI-S ;            ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
:nen9 LONDONDECL ;   ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
! with ordinary genitive Itkonena

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG  ! Finnish names
:s FI-S_PLC-ORG ;            ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
:nen9 LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;   ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
! with ordinary genitive Itkonena


! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S
@U.Cap.Obl@ FI-S-OBL ;

! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ FI-S-OBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON FI-S-OBL
+Cmp/SgGen: RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

LEXICON FI-S-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Cmp/SgGen: RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Ess:in K ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON FI-S-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +Der/lasj:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
+N+Prop+Attr+Err/Orth: flag# ; !

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames.
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/NG:%>s flag# ; ! Gerhardsens plass (XXX we need a tag for this)
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K                  ; ! Londonai
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K                  ; ! Londonas

LEXICON LONDON-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgplc
 LONDON-org ;
 LONDON-plc ;

LEXICON LONDON-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON-malsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;
+Err/Lex:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON LONDON-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON LONDON-plc-not-sur
! +Err/Orth:  BERN-plc-not-sur ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K                  ; ! Londonai
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K                  ; ! Londonas

LEXICON JOKULL-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON LONDON-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON LONDONDECL ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
@U.Cap.Obl@ LONDON-UCASE ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
@U.Cap.Obl@ LONDON-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON LONDONDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
@U.Cap.Obl@ LONDON-UCASE-LOAN ;


LEXICON LONDON-UCASE
+Attr: K ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s K ; ! Ty^dal:s
LONDON-OBL ;
+Sg+Gen+Allegro: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;

+Err/Orth:%: LONDON-OBL ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
+Err/Orth:∑- LONDON-OBL ; !
+Err/Orth:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
+Err/Orth:∑- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)

LEXICON LONDON-UCASE_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
                 +Attr:    K                  ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:    RHyph              ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:    RProp          ;
      +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K                  ; ! Londonai
      +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K                  ; ! Londonas
      +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                           LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
       +Sg+Acc+Allegro+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K ;
       +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K ;
             +Err/Orth:%:  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
             +Err/Orth:∑-  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
             +Err/Orth:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
             +Err/Orth:∑-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)
